test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kooppain_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - kooppâin: # 1Bj
    kooppâin+N+Sg+Nom: kooppânin
    kooppâin+N+Sg+Gen: kooppânin
    kooppâin+N+Sg+Acc: kooppânin
    kooppâin+N+Sg+Ill: kopânjân
    kooppâin+N+Sg+Loc: kopânjist
    kooppâin+N+Sg+Com: kopânjáin
    kooppâin+N+Sg+Abe: kooppâinttáá
    kooppâin+N+Ess:    kopânjin
    kooppâin+N+Par:    kopânjid
    kooppâin+N+Pl+Nom: kopânjeh
    kooppâin+N+Pl+Gen: kopânjij
    kooppâin+N+Pl+Acc: kopânjijd
    kooppâin+N+Pl+Ill: kopânjáid
    kooppâin+N+Pl+Loc: kopânjijn
    kooppâin+N+Pl+Com: kopânjijguin
    kooppâin+N+Pl+Abe: kopânjijttáá
   
